Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-201.01
Legislative intent.

The Legislature hereby recognizes and declares that the livestock industry is an integral component in the economy of this state and that the continued viability of such industry is essential to the prosperity and well-being of all citizens of this state. The Legislature further recognizes that the livestock industry of this state provides food for the state, the nation, and the world, and that the benefits of a financially sound industry are far reaching. It is hereby declared to be the purpose of sections 54-201 and 54-201.01 to afford protection to those persons involved in the care and feeding of livestock in this state by providing some security of compensation for services rendered.

Laws 1982, LB 962, § 1.